src/fst/morphology/incoming/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON isi-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! Two 3S, 3P, 4 forms are attested here (e.g., ìzìl, ììzil "3S got hot")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaS  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;

LEXICON isi-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Same forms as si-AFF-InnerPrefix; reuse those definitions here.
! TODO: confirm that this works!
                                             si-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON isi-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@isis  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@isí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaS  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ì     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ì     #;


LEXICON isis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! CHECK: 3S form requires confirmation in additional documentation
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@isís  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaS  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON isis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Same forms as sis-AFF-InnerPrefix; reuse those definitions here.
                                             sis-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON isis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@isis  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@isís  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology works? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaS  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;


LEXICON isii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! Two 3P, 4 forms are attested (e.g., gììdùn, gìsdùn '3P got a swelling')
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsàS  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs    #;

LEXICON isii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! Same forms as sii-AFF-InnerPrefix; reuse those definitions here.
                                             sii-AFF-InnerPrefix;

LEXICON isii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@isis  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@isíí  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK?
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK? 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaS  #; ! CHECK: morphophonology OK? 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìì    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #; 
